Tennessee statutes. Title 10 Public Libraries, Archives and Records
Part 5 Miscellaneous Provisions
10-7-505. Denial of access — Procedures for obtaining access — Court orders — Injunctions — Appeals — Liability for nondisclosure.

Any citizen of Tennessee who shall request the right of personal inspection of any state, county or municipal record as provided in § 10-7-503, and whose request has been in whole or in part denied by the official and/or designee of the official or through any act or regulation of any official or designee of any official, shall be entitled to petition for access to any such record and to obtain judicial review of the actions taken to deny the access.

Such petition shall be filed in the chancery court or circuit court for the county in which the county or municipal records sought are situated, or in any other court of that county having equity jurisdiction. In the case of records in the custody and control of any state department, agency or instrumentality, such petition shall be filed in the chancery court or circuit court of Davidson County; or in the chancery court or circuit court for the county in which the state records are situated if different from Davidson County, or in any other court of that county having equity jurisdiction; or in the chancery court or circuit court in the county of the petitioner's residence, or in any other court of that county having equity jurisdiction. Upon filing of the petition, the court shall, upon request of the petitioning party, issue an order requiring the defendant or respondent party or parties to immediately appear and show cause, if they have any, why the petition should not be granted. A formal written response to the petition shall not be required, and the generally applicable periods of filing such response shall not apply in the interest of expeditious hearings. The court may direct that the records being sought be submitted under seal for review by the court and no other party. The decision of the court on the petition shall constitute a final judgment on the merits.

The burden of proof for justification of nondisclosure of records sought shall be upon the official and/or designee of the official of those records and the justification for the nondisclosure must be shown by a preponderance of the evidence.

The court, in ruling upon the petition of any party proceeding hereunder, shall render written findings of fact and conclusions of law and shall be empowered to exercise full injunctive remedies and relief to secure the purposes and intentions of this section, and this section shall be broadly construed so as to give the fullest possible public access to public records.

Upon a judgment in favor of the petitioner, the court shall order that the records be made available to the petitioner unless:

There is a timely filing of a notice of appeal; and

The court certifies that there exists a substantial legal issue with respect to the disclosure of the documents which ought to be resolved by the appellate courts.

Any public official required to produce records pursuant to this part shall not be found criminally or civilly liable for the release of such records, nor shall a public official required to release records in such public official's custody or under such public official's control be found responsible for any damages caused, directly or indirectly, by the release of such information.

If the court finds that the governmental entity, or agent thereof, refusing to disclose a record, knew that such record was public and willfully refused to disclose it, such court may, in its discretion, assess all reasonable costs involved in obtaining the record, including reasonable attorneys' fees, against the nondisclosing governmental entity. In determining whether the action was willful, the court may consider any guidance provided to the records custodian by the office of open records counsel as created in title 8, chapter 4.

Acts 1957, ch. 285, § 3; 1975, ch. 127, § 2; 1977, ch. 152, § 4; T.C.A., § 15-306; Acts 1984, ch. 929, §§ 2, 4; 1985, ch. 342, § 1; 1988, ch. 888, § 1; 2008, ch. 1179, §§ 2-4.

Cross-References. Penalty for misdemeanor, §§ 39-11-114, 40-35-111.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Public Records Act and Statutory Exceptions “Otherwise Provided by State Law” (Craig E. Willis), 43 Tenn B.J. 20 (2007).

Updating Tennessee's Public Records Law (Douglas Pierce), 24 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 24 (1988).

Fourth Amendment Searches in First Amendment Spaces: Balancing Free Association with Law and Order in the Age of the Surveillance State, 50 U. Mem. L. Rev. 231 (Fall 2019).

Attorney General Opinions. Identification and notice requirement for access to public information under § 2-10-111; OAG 98-040, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 40 (2/9/98).

Health care provider's license and license application are public records, OAG 99-061, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 38 (3/10/99).

Denial of non-resident's request for copies of public traffic citations, OAG 99-067, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 67 (3/18/99).

Crime victim's notice and opportunity to object to release of personal information, OAG 99-069, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 69 (3/22/99).

To the extent a social media account created and maintained by a municipality is made “pursuant to law or ordinance or in connection with the transaction of official business,” that account and any comments posted on the account constitute public records subject to inspection under the Tennessee Public Records Act. The Act does not address whether comments posted on a municipal social media account are subject to removal or censorship. It only provides a statutory right of inspection of public records to Tennessee citizens. Furthermore, to the extent a municipality has any “public records” with respect to the appointment and identity of an administrator of a municipal social media account, those records are subject to inspection under the Tennessee Public Records Act. OAG 16-47, 2016 Tenn. AG LEXIS 46 (12/22/2016).

A records custodian of municipal public records is required to respond to a public records request. If a records custodian denies a request for public records or otherwise fails to timely respond to the request in accordance with the statutory procedures, the Tennessee citizen making the request may bring an action pursuant to T.C.A. § 10-7-505 in chancery or circuit court for the county in which the records are situated for judicial review of the denial of access to the requested records. A member of the public may also consult with the Office of Open Records Counsel, who has the authority to answer questions, to issue informal advisory opinions, and to informally mediate and assist with the resolution of issues concerning the open records laws. OAG 16-47, 2016 Tenn. AG LEXIS 46 (12/22/2016).

10-7-506. Right to inspect public records — Public records having commercial value.

In all cases where any person has the right to inspect any such public records, such person shall have the right to take extracts or make copies thereof, and to make photographs or photostats of the same while such records are in the possession, custody and control of the lawful custodian thereof or such custodian's authorized deputy; provided, that the lawful custodian of such records shall have the right to adopt and enforce reasonable rules governing the making of such extracts, copies, photographs or photostats.

Within ten (10) days of the release of public records originating in the office of the county assessor of property, the state agency releasing such records shall notify, in writing, the assessor of property of the county in which such records originated of the records released and the name and address of the person or firm receiving the records. The reporting requirements of this subsection (b) shall not apply when county or city summary assessment information is released.

If a request is made for a copy of a public record that has commercial value, and such request requires the reproduction of all or a portion of a computer generated map or other similar geographic data that was developed with public funds, a state department or agency or a political subdivision of the state having primary responsibility for the data or system may establish and impose reasonable fees for the reproduction of such record, in addition to any fees or charges that may lawfully be imposed pursuant to this section. The additional fees authorized by this subsection (c) may not be assessed against individuals who request copies of records for themselves or when the record requested does not have commercial value. State departments and agencies and political subdivisions of the state may charge a reasonable fee (cost of reproduction only) for information requested by the news media for news gathering purposes (broadcast or publication).

The additional fees authorized by this subsection (c) shall relate to the actual development costs of such maps or geographic data and may include:

Labor costs;

Costs incurred in design, development, testing, implementation and training; and

Costs necessary to ensure that the map or data is accurate, complete and current, including the cost of adding to, updating, modifying and deleting information.

The development cost recovery set forth above shall be limited to not more than ten percent (10%) of the total development costs unless additional development cost recovery between ten percent (10%) and twenty percent (20%) is approved by the following procedures: For state departments and agencies, the information systems council (ISC) shall review a proposed business plan explaining the need for the additional development cost recovery. If the ISC approves additional development cost recovery, such recovery shall be submitted to the general assembly for approval. For political subdivisions of the state, approval for additional development cost recovery as contained in a proposed business plan must be obtained from the governing legislative body. If the governing legislative body approves additional development cost recovery, such recovery shall be submitted to the ISC for approval. The development costs of any system being recovered with fees authorized by this section shall be subject to audit by the comptroller of the treasury, it being the legislative intent that once such additional fees have paid the portion of the development costs authorized above, such fees shall be adjusted to generate only the amount necessary to maintain the data and ensure that it is accurate, complete and current for the life of the particular system. Notwithstanding the limitations above, the recovery of maintenance costs shall not be subject to the limitations and procedures provided above for the recovery of development costs.

As used in this subsection (c), “record that has commercial value” means a record requested for any purpose other than:

A non-business use by an individual; and

A news gathering use by the news media.

Acts 1957, ch. 285, § 4; T.C.A., § 15-307; Acts 1986, ch. 546, § 1; 1991, ch. 433, § 1; 1992, ch. 682, § 1; 1997, ch. 97, § 1; 2000, ch. 868, §§ 1-5.

Cross-References. Public records having commercial value, § 7-52-135.

Records or papers in office of secretary of state, § 8-3-104.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1986, 54 Tenn. L. Rev. 457 (1987).

Attorney General Opinions. Computerized voter registration lists — Public Records Act, OAG 92-63, 1992 Tenn. AG LEXIS 61 (10/8/92).

Confidentiality of 911 tapes used in pending criminal investigation, OAG 99-022, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 29 (2/9/99).

Denial of non-resident's request for copies of public traffic citations, OAG 99-067, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 67 (3/18/99).

A local government may generally recoup its costs for supplying requested copies, OAG 01-021, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 21 (2/8/01).

Local law enforcement agencies lack authority to charge a fee to the Tennessee department of children's services for the processing of criminal background checks, OAG 01-139, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 146 (9/4/01).

City governments may not arbitrarily set a fee for copying or duplicating routine public records; the custodian of public records may charge a copying fee only under reasonable rules, OAG 02-065, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 69 (5/17/02).

A custodian of public records is authorized to charge the actual costs it incurs in disclosing a public record in the exact format requested by a member of the public, OAG 02-065, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 69 (5/17/02).

City governments are subject to the requirement that the custodian of records may charge only as much as reasonably approximates the actual costs of copying a public record, OAG 02-065, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 69 (5/17/02).

Duties and responsibilities of a records custodian under the Public Records Act, OAG 06-069, 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 78 (4/12/06).

10-7-507. Records of convictions of traffic and other violations — Availability.

Any public official having charge or custody of or control over any public records of convictions of traffic violations or any other state, county or municipal public offenses shall make available to any citizen, upon request, during regular office hours, a copy or copies of any such record requested by such citizen, upon the payment of a reasonable charge or fee therefor. Such official is authorized to fix a charge or fee per copy that would reasonably defray the cost of producing and delivering such copy or copies.

Acts 1974, ch. 581, § 1; T.C.A., § 15-308.

Law Reviews.

Protecting Privacy From Government Invasion: Legislation at the Federal and State Levels, 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 783.

Attorney General Opinions. Publication of criminal case dispositions on the internet, OAG 00-014, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 14 (1/26/00).

Local law enforcement agencies lack authority to charge a fee to the Tennessee department of children's services for the processing of criminal background checks, OAG 01-139, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 146 (9/4/01).

10-7-508. Access to records — Records of archival value — Retention or disposal of records.

The secretary of state or the secretary of state’s designated representative, the state librarian and archivist, and the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designated representative for purposes of audit, shall be accorded access to and may examine and receive any public records or writings, whether or not they are subject to public inspection. They shall maintain inviolate any privileged or confidential information so acquired and any record or writing so defined by law.

The state librarian and archivist or an archivist designated by the state librarian and archivist and the secretary of state or a records analyst designated by the secretary of state shall be accorded access to and may examine any confidential public records for the purpose of determining, in consultation with the agency head or a representative of the agency which has title to the records, whether such records are records of archival value or whether such records are properly filed or designated as confidential. If the state librarian and archivist or such representative, the secretary of state or such representative and the agency head or such representative should determine that certain administrative or otherwise open public records have been inappropriately filed and designated as confidential public records, then such records shall be removed from the designation of confidential and filed within the appropriate level of access designation. Such access to appraise the archival value of such confidential records shall be provided for in the scheduling of retention periods through appropriate records disposition authorizations which are reviewed and approved by the public records commission.

Records determined to be of archival value shall be retained as provided in rules and regulations for records management of records of archival value of the public records commission, and those confidential records determined not to be of archival value shall be disposed of by authorized means and in accordance with approved records disposition authorizations.

Acts 1978, ch. 544, § 2; T.C.A., § 15-309; Acts 1984, ch. 947, § 3; 2013, ch. 207, §§ 8, 9.

Cross-References. Confidential public record defined, § 10-7-301.

Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

Records of archival value defined, § 10-7-301.

10-7-509. Disposition of records.

The disposition of all state records shall occur only through the process of an approved records disposition authorization.

Records authorized for destruction shall be disposed of according to the records disposition authorization and shall not be given to any unauthorized person, transferred to another agency, political subdivision, or private or semiprivate institution.

Acts 1978, ch. 544, § 2; T.C.A., § 15-310.

Attorney General Opinions. A district attorney general may reformat case files from paper format to electronic format only pursuant to an approved records disposition authorization and may destroy the original paper versions of case files only pursuant to an approved records disposition authorization. OAG 15-80, 2015 Tenn. AG LEXIS 81 (12/17/2015).

10-7-510. Transfer of documents from criminal cases to not-for-profit depositories.

The district attorney general of a judicial district, after giving written notice of the proposed transfer prior to such transfer to the presiding officer of the legislative body in which such record, document or evidence is located, may permanently transfer custody and ownership of all original records, documents and physical evidence in the district attorney general's possession that was collected, compiled and maintained in a particular criminal case or investigation to a university or other institution of higher education, museum, library or other not-for-profit corporation organized for the primary purpose of preserving and displaying items of historical significance, if:

The university, museum, library or not-for-profit corporation has formally requested transfer of the records, documents and evidence in a particular case or investigation;

The documents, records and evidence requested are, in the opinion of such district attorney general, of historical significance and their display would enhance public understanding, education or appreciation of a particular time or event in history;

The documents, records and evidence requested have by operation of law become public records; and

The district attorney general or clerk duplicates or photographs all documents and records transferred in a manner approved by the public records commission.

If such original records, documents or physical evidence are in the sole custody of the criminal court clerk of any judicial district, such clerk may permanently transfer custody and ownership of such records, documents or physical evidence with the approval of the district attorney general of the appropriate judicial district, after giving written notice of the proposed transfer prior to such transfer to the presiding officer of the legislative body for the jurisdiction in which such record, document or evidence is located.

If it is determined that such documents, records and evidence are to be transferred, the district attorney general shall make the final decision as to the date, time and method by which such transfer is effectuated.

Upon the transfer of such documents, records and evidence as provided by this section, any party desiring to view such material shall do so at the site where the material has been transferred.

As used in this section, “historical significance” means that the event giving rise to the documents, records or evidence being transferred occurred twenty (20) years or more prior to April 18, 1994.

This section does not apply to records or documents which are made confidential by any provision of law.

Acts 1994, ch. 826, § 1.

10-7-511. Preservation of records of permanent value.

Responsibility for providing trained staff and appropriate equipment necessary to produce and store microfilm reproductions of official, permanent value bound volume records created by the various county and municipal governments of the state is hereby vested in the state library and archives. To implement this security microfilming program, the state librarian and archivist is authorized to develop a priority listing of essential records based on retention schedules developed by the county technical assistance service and the municipal technical advisory service. This priority listing of essential records may be revised from time to time to accommodate critical needs in individual counties or municipalities or to reflect changes in retention schedules. The camera negative of the microfilmed records shall be stored in the security vault at the state library and archives and duplicate rolls of these microfilmed records shall be made available to county and municipal governments on a cost basis.

Acts 1971, ch. 242, § 1; 1977, ch. 486, § 2; T.C.A., 15-513; Acts 1991, ch. 369, § 5; 1994, ch. 884, § 8; Acts 1999, ch. 167, §§ 5, 6.

Compiler's Notes. This section was transferred to this location from former § 10-7-413(c) pursuant to Acts 1999, ch. 167, § 6, effective May 17, 1999.

10-7-512. Electronic mail communications systems — Monitoring of electronic mail communications — Policy required.

On or before July 1, 2000, the state or any agency, institution, or political subdivision thereof that operates or maintains an electronic mail communications system shall adopt a written policy on any monitoring of electronic mail communications and the circumstances under which it will be conducted.

The policy shall include a statement that correspondence of the employee in the form of electronic mail may be a public record under the public records law and may be subject to public inspection under this part.

Acts 1999, ch. 304, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1999, ch. 304, § 1 provided: “The general assembly hereby finds and declares that the use of electronic mail by agencies, officials, and employees of state government creates unique circumstances. Electronic mail shares some features with telephonic communication, which generally is not stored in any form and is generally regarded as private. However, electronic mail differs in that it creates an electronic record that may be used or retrieved in electronic or paper format. The use of electronic mail is becoming more common and more important in facilitating the ability of government officials to gather information and communicate with their staff, other officials and agencies, and the public. However, individual officials are not equipped to act as official custodians of such communications and to determine whether or not the communications might be public records. For these reasons, the general assembly requests that a study of the use of electronic mail be conducted to balance the privacy interests and practical limitations of public officials and employees with the public policy interests in access to government information. Such study shall be conducted by the computer subcommittee of the joint management committee of the Tennessee general assembly.”

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

Harassment via electronic means, § 39-17-308.

10-7-513. Request for removal of military discharge or redaction of social security number from military discharge.

This section applies to a military veteran's department of defense form DD-214 or other military discharge record that is recorded with or that otherwise comes into the possession of a governmental body.

The record is confidential for the seventy-five (75) years following the date it is recorded with or otherwise first comes into the possession of a governmental body. During such period, the governmental body may permit inspection or copying of the record or disclose information contained in the record only in accordance with this section or in accordance with a court order.

On request and presentation of proper identification, the following persons may inspect the military discharge record or obtain from the governmental body a copy or certified copy of such record:

The veteran who is the subject of the record;

The legal guardian of the veteran;

The spouse or a child or parent of the veteran or, if there is no living spouse, child, or parent, the nearest living relative of the veteran;

The personal representative of the estate of the veteran;

The person named by the veteran, or by a person described by subdivision (c)(2), (c)(3), or (c)(4), in an appropriate power of attorney;

Another governmental body; or

An authorized representative of the funeral home that assists with the burial of the veteran.

A court that orders the release of information under this section shall limit the further disclosure of the information and the purposes for which the information may be used.

A governmental body that obtains information from the record shall limit the governmental body's use and disclosure of the information to the purpose for which the information was obtained.

Any person described in subdivisions (c)(1)-(5) may request that a county register of deeds remove from the official records held in such register's office, excepting records preserved on microfilm, any of the following record forms: DD-214, DD-215, WD AGO 55, WD AGO 53-55, NAVMC 78-PD, NAVPERS 553, or any other military discharge, or alternatively may request that the veteran's social security identification number be redacted from any such military discharge record if such records are stored in a manner that permits redaction.

The request for removal of a military discharge record or redaction of a social security number from a military discharge record in the office of the county register of deeds pursuant to subdivision (f)(1) shall be made on a paper writing in a form substantially as follows:

REQUEST FOR REMOVAL OF MILITARY DISCHARGE OR REDACTION OF SOCIAL SECURITY NUMBER FROM A MILITARY DISCHARGE

1. Full Name of Veteran:

2. Name of Person Making Request:

3. If not the Veteran making the request, identify the legal relationship that entitles the Person Making Request to make the request: (check one)

4. Check (a) or (b):

5. Type of Military Discharge Record:

6. Book and Page Number or other reference identifying where the military discharge record is recorded in the County Register's office:

Book No. Page No. ; or

No.

7. Signature of Person Making Request:

State of Tennessee

County of

Personally appeared before me __________, (person duly authorized to take acknowledgments in county), the within named , with whom I am personally acquainted (or proven to me on the basis of satisfactory evidence) and who acknowledges that such person executed the within instrument for the purpose of making a request of the Register of Deeds of County, Tennessee, to remove a military discharge record or redact a social security identification number from a military discharge record, excepting microfilm records.

Witness my hand this day of , 20 .

(signature of person taking acknowledgement)

[Space for Seal of Office]

The completed request form as provided in subdivision (f)(2) is eligible for recording in the office of the county register of deeds where submitted. The register has no duty to inquire beyond the acknowledged request to verify the identity or authority of the person requesting the removal. Upon recording the written request, the county register shall act in accordance with the request to either remove the military discharge record identified in the request from the records of the office, except microfilm records, or redact the social security identification number from a military discharge record recorded in the office of the county register if practicable. If redaction is requested and is not practicable, the county register shall not record the request and shall, verbally or by writing, explain to the person making the request why redaction is not practicable and state that the person may instead request the removal of the military discharge record from the records of the county register.

Spouse, child, or parent (or nearest living relative if there is no living spouse, child, or parent) of the veteran

Attorney-in-fact

Personal Representative of Veteran's Estate

Legal Guardian

Request removal of military discharge record

Request redaction of social security number on military discharge record (if practicable)

Acts 2003, ch. 292, § 1; 2010, ch. 797, § 1; 2016, ch. 694, § 1.

Cross-References. Request for redaction of social security number from official records, § 58-4-103.

10-7-514. Subscription service required to view military discharge record over internet.

A county register shall not cause a military discharge record recorded in the office of the county register to be viewed over the internet except through a subscription service approved by the county register.

Acts 2003, ch. 292, § 1.

10-7-515. Personally identifying information on documents — Redaction.

The preparer of any document recorded in the office of the county register of deeds shall not place personally identifying information on any document filed or recorded in the office of the county register of deeds, other than a power of attorney. However, the county register shall not refuse to record a document for failure of the preparer to comply with the prohibition contained in this section regarding use of personally identifying information; nor shall the failure to comply with such prohibition affect the validity or recordability of any document.

Any person or the surviving spouse, attorney-in-fact, or court appointed guardian of the person, may request that a county register of deeds redact the person's personally identifying information from any recorded document, if the records are stored in a manner that permits redaction.

The request for redaction of personally identifying information pursuant to subsection (b) shall be made on a paper writing, in a form substantially as follows:

REQUEST FOR REDACTION OF PERSONALLY IDENTIFYING INFORMATION FROM ELECTRONIC DATABASES

1. Full name of individual whose personally identifying information will be redacted as it appears on the document:

2. Name of person making the request if different than above:

3. If not the individual whose personally identifying information will be redacted, identify the legal relationship that entitles you to make the request: (check one)

a. Surviving spouse

b. Attorney-in-fact

c. Court appointed guardian

4. Type of record:

5. Book and page number or other reference identifying where the document is recorded in the County Register's office:

Book No. Page No. or Instrument No.

6. Signature of person making the request:

State of Tennessee

County of

Personally appeared before me, (person duly authorized to take acknowledgments in [ ] county), the within named , with whom I am personally acquainted (or proven to me on the basis of satisfactory evidence) and who acknowledges that such person executed the within instrument for the purpose of making a request of the Register of Deeds of County, Tennessee, to redact personally identifying information from the aforementioned record, excepting microfilm records.

Witness my hand this day of , 20 .

(signature of person taking acknowledgement)

[Space for Seal of Office]

The completed request form provided in subsection (c) may be recorded in the office of the county register of deeds where submitted. The register has no duty to inquire beyond the acknowledged request to verify the identity or authority of the person requesting the redaction.

Upon recording the written request, the county register shall act in accordance with the request to redact the personally identifying information from electronic databases in the office of the county register where practicable. If redaction is not practicable, the county register shall not record the request form and shall verbally or by writing explain why redaction is impracticable to the person making the request.

A county register of deeds may redact any personally identifying information that is found on a recorded document maintained on a computer or removable computer storage media, including CD-ROM disk, if the records are stored in a manner that permits redaction.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, compliance with this section shall satisfy all of the obligations of a county register of deeds under § 10-7-504(a)(29) relative to the nondisclosure of personally identifying information.

As used in this section, “personally identifying information” has the same meaning as defined in § 10-7-504(a)(29).

Acts 2003, ch. 292, § 1; 2006, ch. 555, § 1; 2009, ch. 260, § 1; 2011, ch. 256, §§ 1, 2; 2015, ch. 45, §§ 1, 2; 2016, ch. 694, § 2; 2016, ch. 914, §§ 1-3.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Acts 2016, ch. 914, which amended this section, referenced “§ 10-7-504(a)(28)” but the reference was changed to “§ 10-7-504(a)(29)” because Acts 2016, ch. 686 had already added subdivision (a)(28) to § 10-7-504.

10-7-516. Information relating to security systems.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, any information relating to security systems for any property including, but not limited to, all records pertaining to licensure or registration by owners of such systems, information, photos, presentations, schematics, surveys, or any other information related to such security systems held or kept by any governmental entity, shall be treated as confidential and shall not be open for public inspection by members of the public.

Acts 2011, ch. 168, § 1.

10-7-517. Referral of certain legislation creating exception to open records requirement
to government operations committee.

Any legislation of the house of representatives that creates an exception to the open records requirement of § 10-7-503 deeming records of public entities to be open for inspection by the public must be referred to the government operations committee according to the rules of the house of representatives.

After review under subsection (a), the government operations committee of the house of representatives shall give the legislation a positive, neutral, or negative recommendation.

The government operations committee of the house of representatives, unless it is designated as the appropriate standing committee, shall not delay or prevent consideration of the legislation by the house of representatives by withholding the committee's recommendation.

Acts 2019, ch. 221, § 1.